test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ӈы: # Noun 'essence / (fin) olemus' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - ŋí
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom: ӈы
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc: ӈымʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen: ӈыʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat: ӈынʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc: ӈыхына
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl: ӈыхыд
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros: ӈывна
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom: ӈыхыʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc: ӈыхыʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen: ӈыхыʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom: ӈыˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc: ӈы
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen: ӈыˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat: ӈыхыˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc: ӈыхыˮна
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl: ӈыхыт
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros: ӈыˮымна
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ӈыв
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ӈыв
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ӈын
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ӈыхын
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ӈыхынан
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ӈыхыдан
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ӈывнан
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ӈыхыюн
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ӈыхыюн
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ӈыхыюн
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӈын
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ӈын
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ӈыˮын
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӈыхыˮн
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ӈыхыˮнан
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ӈыхытан
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ӈыˮымнан
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈыр
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈымд
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈынд
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈыхынд
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈыхынанд
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈыхыданд
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈывнанд
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈыхыюд
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈыхыюд
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈыхыют
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈыд
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈыд
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈыт
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈыхыт
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈыхыˮнат
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈыхытат
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈыˮымнат
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈыда
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈымда
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈында
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈыхында
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈыхынанда
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈыхыданда
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈывнанда
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈыхыюда
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈыхыюда
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈыхыюта
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈыда
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈыда
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈыта
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈыхыта
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈыхыˮната
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: ӈыхытата
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈыˮымната
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈымиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈымиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈыниʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈыхыниʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈыхынаниʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: ӈыхыданиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈывнаниʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈыхыюниʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈыхыюниʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈыхыюниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈыниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈыниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈыˮниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈыхыˮниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈыхыˮнаниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: ӈыхытаниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈыˮымнаниʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈыриʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈымдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈындиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈыхындиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈыхынандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈыхыдандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈывнандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈыхыюдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈыхыюдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈыхыютиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈытиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈыхытиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈыхыˮнатиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: ӈыхытатиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈыˮымнатиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈымдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈындиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈыхындиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈыхынандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈыхыдандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈывнандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈыхыюдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈыхыюдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈыхыютиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈытиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈыхытиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈыхыˮнатиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: ӈыхытатиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈыˮымнатиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈываˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈываˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈынаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈыхынаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈыхынанаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ӈыхыданаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈывнанаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈыхыюнаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈыхыюнаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈыхыюнаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈынаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈынаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈыˮнаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈыхыˮнаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈыхыˮнанаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ӈыхытанаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈыˮымнанаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈыраˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈымдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈындаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈыхындаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈыхынандаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈыхыдандаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈывнандаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈыхыюдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈыхыюдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈыхыютаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈыдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈыдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈытаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈыхытаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈыхыˮнатаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: ӈыхытатаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈыˮымнатаˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈыдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈымдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈындоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈыхындоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈыхынандоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈыхыдандоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈывнандоʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈыхыюдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈыхыюдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈыхыютоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈыдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈыдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈытоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈыхытоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈыхыˮнатоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: ӈыхытатоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈыˮымнатоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Abs: ӈыд
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈыдав, ӈыдув]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈыдав, ӈыдув]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ӈыдан
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈыдар
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈыдамд
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈыданд
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [ӈыдада, ӈыдда]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈыдамда
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈыданда
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [ӈыдамиʼ, ӈыдмиʼ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [ӈыдамиʼ, ӈыдмиʼ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [ӈыданиʼ, ӈыдниʼ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [ӈыдариʼ, ӈыдриʼ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ӈыдамдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ӈыдандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [ӈыдадиʼ, ӈыддиʼ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ӈыдамдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ӈыдандиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [ӈыдаваˮ, ӈыдваˮ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [ӈыдаваˮ, ӈыдваˮ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [ӈыданаˮ, ӈыднаˮ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [ӈыдараˮ, ӈыдраˮ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ӈыдамдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ӈыдандаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [ӈыдадоʼ, ӈыддоʼ]
     ӈы+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ӈыдамдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ӈыдандоʼ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈыдмʼ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈын
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈы
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈыниʼ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыʼ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈываˮ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈыдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыˮ
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈыдамзь
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈынась
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈысь
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈынинзь
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈыдинзь
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхынзь
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈываць
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈыдаць
     ӈы+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыць
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыв
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыр
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыда
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈымиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыриʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈываˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыраˮ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈыдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈывась
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈырась
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈыдась
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈыминзь
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈыринзь
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈыдинзь
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈываць
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈыраць
     ӈы+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈыдонзь
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюн
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюд
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюда
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюниʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюнаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюнась
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдась
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдась
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюнинзь
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдинзь
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдинзь
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюнаць
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдаць
     ӈы+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈыхыюдонзь
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈын
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыд
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыда
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыниʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыдиʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈынаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыдаˮ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈыдоʼ
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈынась
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыдась
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыдась
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈынинзь
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыдинзь
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыдинзь
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈынаць
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыдаць
     ӈы+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈыдонзь
     ӈы+N+Tra: ӈыӈэ
     ӈы+N+Car: ӈысиˮ
     ӈы+N+Equ: ӈыдремʼ
     ӈы+N+Equ+Lat: ӈыдревʼ
